South Dakota, session 2026, SB145.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That § 9-32-1 be AMENDED:
9-32-1. EveryEach municipality shall have power to may do what may be is
necessary or expedient for the promotion of health or the suppression of disease, so long
as, in the absence of an act of martial law having been declared, any measure so taken,
including by ordinance or a resolution, does not prohibit or interfere with the free exercise
of religion, abridge any person's freedom of speech, freedom of the press, or the right of
the people to peaceably assemble, or the right of the people to petition the government
for a redress of grievances under the First Amendment to the United States Constitution,
or prohibit or interfere with activities within any person's residence or privately held
business, or interfere with any person's right to bear arms under the Second Amendment
to the United States Constitution.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.